dictionaries/pl_PL/hyph_pl_PL.dic
UTF-8
.a1
.a2b1s
.a2b2s3t
.a2d3
.a1d4a1
.ad4e1
.ad4i1
.ad4o1
.ad4u1
.ad4y1
.ad5a2p1t
.ad5i2u1
.ad5op
.ad5or
.ae2
.ae3ro1
.a1eroa2
.ae1roe2
.aeroi2
.aero1o2
.aerou2
.a2n1t
.anty1
.a1ntya2
.antye2
.antyi2
.antyo2
.antyu2
.a2r1c
.arcy1
.arcy3b2
.arcy3b1z2
.arcy3k2
.arcy3ł2
.arcy3m2
.a1rcya2
.arcye2
.arcyi2
.arcyo2
.arcyu2
.a2u1
.au3g2
.au3k2
.au3t2
.auto1
.auto3c4h2
.a1utoa2
.autoe2
.autoi2
.auto1o2
.a1utotra1
.autotra2n2s3
.au1tou2
.b8
.4b3b8
.2b1c8
.2b1ć8
.2b1d8
.be1
.be2z3
.beza1
.be3z4an
.be1ze1
.be3z4ec
.bezi1
.be3z4ik
.be2z1c
.bezc4h2
.bezm2
.bezo2
.bezo2b1j
.bezw2
.be4z3z
.bezzw2
.2b1f8
.2b1g8
.bh8
.bj8
.2b1k8
.bl8
.bł8
.2b1m8
.2b1n8
.2b1ń8
.2b1p8
.br8
.br4z8
.2b1s8
.2b1ś8
.2b1t8
.bv8
.bw8
.bx8
.2b1z8
.2b1ź8
.2b1ż8
.c8
.ca1
.cało1
.cało3k2
.cało3ś2
.2c1b8
.4c3c8
.2c1ć8
.2c1d8
.2c1f8
.2c1g8
.c4h8
.c2h2r
.chr4z8
.ci1
.ci2e1
.cie2n1k
.cienko1
.cienko3w2
.ciepło1
.ciepło3kr2
.cj8
.2c1k8
.2c1l8
.cł8
.2c1m8
.2c1n8
.2c1ń8
.2c1p8
.cr8
.2c1s8
.2c1ś8
.2c1t8
.cv8
.cw8
.cx8
.c4z8
.cza1
.cza2r1n
.czarno1
.czarno3k2
.2c2z1k8
.2c2z1t
.czte1
.czte1re1
.cztere2c4h3
.cztere2c2h1s
.czte1re1chse1
.czterechse2t3
.cztero1
.cztero3ś2
.czwó1
.czwó2r3
.czwó3r4a1
.czwó3r4ą1
.czwó3r4e1
.czwó3r4ę1
.czwó3r4o1
.2c1ź8
.2c1ż8
.ć8
.2ć1b8
.2ć1c8
.4ć3ć8
.2ć1d8
.2ć1f8
.2ć1g8
.ćh8
.ćj8
.2ć1k8
.ćl8
.ćł8
.2ć1m8
.2ć1n8
.2ć1ń8
.2ć1p8
.ćr8
.2ć1s8
.2ć1ś8
.2ć1t8
.ćv8
.ćw8
.ćwi1
.ćwi2e1
.ćwie2r2ć3
.ćx8
.2ć1z8
.2ć1ź8
.2ć1ż8
.d8
.da1
.dale1
.daleko1
.daleko3w2
.2d1b8
.2d1c8
.2d1ć8
.4d3d8
.de1
.de2z3
.deza2
.dezabi1
.de3z4a3bil
.de3z4a3wu1
.de1ze1
.de3z4el
.de3z4er
.de3z4y1
.dezo2
.2d1f8
.2d1g8
.dh8
.dj8
.2d1k8
.dl8
.dł8
.dłu1
.długo1
.długo3tr2
.długo3w2
.2d1m8
.2d1n8
.2d1ń8
.do1
.do3b2
.do3c2
.do3ć2
.do3d2
.do3f2
.do3g2
.do3h2
.do3k2
.do3l2
.do3ł2
.do3m2
.do3p2
.do3r2
.do3s2
.do3ś2
.do3t2
.do3w2
.do3z2
.do3ź2
.do3ż2
.do4k3t
.do4l3n
.do4ł3k
.do4m3k
.do4r3s
.do4w3c
.do5m4k2n
.dobr2
.dobr4z2
.doc4h2
.doc4z2
.dod4z2
.dod4ź2
.dod4ż2
.dogr4z2
.do2p1c
.dopc4h2
.dopr4z2
.dor4z2
.do2r1ż2
.dosc4h2
.dosm2
.dos4z2
.do2t1k2
.dotr2
.2d1p8
.dr8
.dro1
.dro1go1
.drogo3w2
.dr4z8
.2d1s8
.2d1ś8
.2d1t8
.dv8
.dw8
.dwó1
.dwó2j3
.dwó3j4a1
.dwó3j4ą1
.dwó3j4e1
.dwó3j4ę1
.dwó3j4o1
.dx8
.dy1
.dy2s3
.dy2z3
.dy3s4e1
.dy3s4o1
.dy3s4ta1
.dy3s4y1
.dy3s4z
.dy3z4e1
.dyzu2
.d4z8
.dzi1
.dzi2e1
.dzi1esi1
.dziesi2ę1
.dzi1esi1ęci1
.dziesięci2o1
.dziesięcio3ś2
.dzi1ewi1
.dziewi2ę1
.dziewię2ć3
.dzi1ewi1ęci1
.dziewięci2o1
.dziewięcio3ś2
.dziewię2ć1s
.dzie1więćse1
.dziewięćse2t3
.d4ź8
.d4ż8
.e1
.e2k2s3
.e1me1
.emes4z
.e1me1sze1
.e2m3e2s5ze2t
.e1se1
.e2s1e2s1ma1
.e2s1ha1
.e2s1t
.ego1
.egoa2
.e1goe2
.egoi2
.ego1o2
.egou2
.eks4y1
.e1le1
.ele2k1t
.elektro1
.elektroa2
.e1le1ktroe2
.elektroi2
.elektro1o2
.elektrou2
.f8
.fb8
.2f1c8
.fć8
.fd8
.4f3f8
.fg8
.fh8
.fj8
.2f1k8
.fl8
.fł8
.2f1m8
.2f1n8
.fń8
.fp8
.fr8
.fs8
.fś8
.ft8
.fv8
.fw8
.fx8
.fz8
.fź8
.fż8
.g8
.2g1b8
.2g1c8
.2g1ć8
.2g1d8
.ge1
.ge2o3
.2g1f8
.4g3g8
.gh8
.gj8
.2g1k8
.gl8
.gł8
.2g1m8
.gn8
.2g1ń8
.go1
.go2u3
.2g1p8
.gr8
.gru1
.grubo1
.grubo3w2
.gr4z8
.2g1s8
.2g1ś8
.2g1t8
.gv8
.gw8
.gx8
.2g1z8
.2g1ź8
.2g1ż8
.h8
.2h1b8
.2h1c8
.2h1ć8
.2h1d8
.2h1f8
.2h1g8
.4h3h8
.hi1
.hipe1
.hipe2r3
.hipe3r4o1
.hipera2
.hipe1re2
.2h1j8
.2h1k8
.2h1l8
.2h1ł8
.2h1m8
.2h1n8
.2h1ń8
.2h1p8
.2h1r8
.2h1s8
.2h1ś8
.2h1t8
.hv8
.2h1w8
.hx8
.2h1z8
.2h1ź8
.2h1ż8
.i1
.i2n3
.i2s3l
.i1ni1
.i3n4ic
.i3n4o1
.i3n4u1
.i4n5o2k
.i2n1f
.infla1
.in4f3lan
.ino3w2
.izo1
.izoa2
.izoe2
.i1zoi2
.izo1o2
.izou2
.j8
.ja1
.jadło1
.jadło3w2
.2j1b8
.2j1c8
.2j1ć8
.2j1d8
.2j1f8
.2j1g8
.2j1h8
.4j3j8
.2j1k8
.2j1l8
.2j1ł8
.2j1m8
.2j1n8
.2j1ń8
.2j1p8
.2j1r8
.2j1s8
.2j1ś8
.2j1t8
.jv8
.2j1w8
.jx8
.2j1z8
.2j1ź8
.2j1ż8
.k8
.2k1b8
.2k1c8
.2k1ć8
.2k1d8
.2k1f8
.2k1g8
.kh8
.ki1
.ki2l1k
.kilku1
.kilkuse1
.kilkuse2t3
.kilkuseto2
.kj8
.4k3k8
.kl8
.kł8
.2k1m8
.2k1n8
.2k1ń8
.ko1
.ko1ło1
.koło3w2
.ko2n1t
.kon2t2r3
.kon3tr4a1
.kon3tr4e1
.ko1ntro2
.kon3tr4o3l
.kon3tr4o3w
.kon3tr4y1
.kon4tr5a2gi1
.kon4tr5a2se1
.kon4tr5a2sy1
.kon4tr5a2ta1
.kon4tr5a2d1m
.kon4tr5a2k1c
.kon4tr5a2l1t
.kon4tr5a2r1g
.kontru2
.2k1p8
.kr8
.kro1
.kro2ć3
.kró1
.kró2t1k
.krótko1
.krótko3tr2
.krótko3w2
.kr4z8
.2k1s8
.2k1ś8
.2k1t8
.kv8
.kw8
.kx8
.2k1z8
.2k1ź8
.2k1ż8
.l8
.2l1b8
.2l1c8
.2l1ć8
.2l1d8
.2l1f8
.2l1g8
.2l1h8
.2l1j8
.2l1k8
.4l3l8
.2l1ł8
.2l1m8
.2l1n8
.2l1ń8
.2l1p8
.2l1r8
.2l1s8
.2l1ś8
.2l1t8
.lu1
.ludo1
.ludo3w2
.lv8
.2l1w8
.lx8
.2l1z8
.2l1ź8
.2l1ż8
.ł8
.2ł1b8
.2ł1c8
.2ł1ć8
.2ł1d8
.2ł1f8
.2ł1g8
.2ł1h8
.2ł1j8
.2ł1k8
.2ł1l8
.4ł3ł8
.2ł1m8
.2ł1n8
.2ł1ń8
.2ł1p8
.2ł1r8
.2ł1s8
.2ł1ś8
.2ł1t8
.łv8
.2ł1w8
.łx8
.2ł1z8
.2ł1ź8
.2ł1ż8
.m8
.2m1b8
.2m1c8
.2m1ć8
.2m1d8
.2m1f8
.2m1g8
.2m1h8
.mi1
.mi1li1
.mili2a1
.mili3a2m1p
.2m1j8
.2m1k8
.2m1l8
.2m1ł8
.4m3m8
.2m1n8
.2m1ń8
.mo1
.mo2ż1n
.mo1żno1
.możno3w2
.2m1p8
.2m1r8
.2m1s8
.2m1ś8
.2m1t8
.mv8
.2m1w8
.mx8
.2m1z8
.2m1ź8
.2m1ż8
.n8
.na1
.na2d2
.na2j
.na3b2
.na3c2
.na3ć2
.nad3i2
.na3d4ir
.nad3ł2
.nadłu1
.na3d4łub
.na2d3m2
.nadmu1
.na3d4muc4h
.nad3r2
.na3d4r2w
.nadre1
.nadre2p1c
.na3d4repc4z
.na3d4re2p1t
.nadrę1
.na3d4ręc4z
.nadru1
.na3d4ruk
.na3d4r4z
.nad3w2
.nadwo1
.na3d4wo2r1n
.na1da1
.na3daj
.na3dą1
.na3de1
.na3dę1
.na3do1
.na3dy1
.nad4z2
.na3dzi1
.na3d4ź2
.na3f2
.na3g2
.na3h2
.na1ja1
.na3ja2z1d
.na3ją1
.na3je1
.na3ję1
.na3k2
.na3l2
.na3ł2
.na3m2
.na3p2
.na3r2
.na3s2
.na3ś2
.na3t2
.na3u2
.na3w2
.na3z2
.na3ź2
.na3ż2
.na4d3o2b2ł
.nado1bo1
.nadobo2j1c
.na4d3o2bojc4z
.na4d3o2bowi1
.nado1bro1
.na4d3o2brot
.na4d3o2dr4z
.nadoki1
.nadoki2e1
.na4d3o2kien
.nado2l1b
.na4d3olbr4z
.na4d5rzą1
.nadrze1
.na4d5rzec4z
.na4d5rzę1
.na4d5rzy1
.nadzi2e1
.na4d5ziem
.na4f3c
.na4f3t
.na4j3e2f
.na4j3e2g
.na4j3e2k2s
.na4j3e2ko1
.na4j3e2n
.na4j3e2r
.na4j3e2s
.na4j3e2w
.na4j3e2m1f
.na4j3e2u1
.na4r3c
.na4r3d
.na4r3k
.na4r3r
.na4r3t
.nabr4z2
.nac4h2
.nac4z2
.na2d3b2
.na2d3c2
.na2d3ć2
.na4d3d2
.nade3t2
.na1deta1
.nad3e2tat
.na2d3f2
.na2d3g2
.nad3h2
.nad3j2
.na2d3k2
.nad3l2
.na2d3n2
.na2d3p2
.na2d3s2
.na2d3ś2
.na2d3t2
.nad3u2
.na2dz1m
.nadzmy1
.nad5z2mys
.nad5zo1
.nad5zó1
.nadzwy1
.nad5zwyc4z
.nad5ż2
.nadc4h2
.nadc4z2
.nadd4ź2
.nade3b2
.nade3c2
.nade3ć2
.nade3d2
.nade3f2
.nade3g2
.nade3h2
.nade3k2
.nade3l2
.nade3ł2
.nade3m2
.nade3p2
.nade3r2
.nade3s2
.nade3ś2
.nade3w2
.nade3z2
.nade3ź2
.nade3ż2
.nade4p3c
.nade4p3n
.nade4p3t
.nadec4h2
.nadec4z2
.naded4z2
.naded4ź2
.naded4ż2
.nader4z2
.nade2r1ż2
.nades4z2
.nads4z2
.nadśro1
.nadśrod4z
.nadśrodzi1
.nadśrodzi2e1
.nadśrod5ziem
.nadtr2
.nagr4z2
.naj3a2k1t
.naj3a2u1
.na2j3b2
.na2j3c2
.na2j3ć2
.na2j3d2
.na2j3f2
.na2j3g2
.na2j3h2
.naj3i2
.na2j3k2
.na2j3l2
.na2j3ł2
.na2j3m2
.naj3o2
.naj3o2b2
.naj3o2c2
.naj3o2ć2
.naj3o2d2
.naj3o2f2
.naj3o2g2
.naj3o2h2
.naj3o2k2
.naj3o2l2
.naj3o2ł2
.naj3o2m2
.naj3o2p2
.naj3o2r2
.naj3o2s2
.naj3o2ś2
.naj3o2t2
.naj3o2w2
.naj3o2z2
.naj3o2ź2
.naj3o2ż2
.na2j3p2
.na2j3r2
.najro1
.naj3ro2z3
.na2j3s2
.na2j3ś2
.na2j3t2
.naj3u2
.na2j3w2
.na2j3z2
.na2j3ź2
.na2j3ż2
.najbe1
.najbe2z3
.najbezw2
.najc4h2
.najc4z2
.najdo1
.najdo3b2
.najdo3c2
.najdo3ć2
.najdo3d2
.najdo3f2
.najdo3g2
.najdo3h2
.najdo3k2
.najdo3l2
.najdo3ł2
.najdo3m2
.najdo3p2
.najdo3r2
.najdo3s2
.najdo3ś2
.najdo3t2
.najdo3w2
.najdo3z2
.najdo3ź2
.najdo3ż2
.najdoc4h2
.najdoc4z2
.najdod4z2
.najdod4ź2
.najdod4ż2
.najdor4z2
.najdos4z2
.najdo2t1k2
.najd4z2
.najd4ź2
.najd4ż2
.najkr2
.najo2b3c2
.najo2b3ć2
.najo2b3d2
.najo2b3f2
.najo2b3g2
.najob3h2
.najob3j2
.najo2b3k2
.najob3l2
.najob3ł2
.najo2b3m2
.najo2b3n2
.najo2b3p2
.najo2b3s2
.najo2b3ś2
.najo2b3t2
.najob3w2
.najo2b3ź2
.najo2b3ż2
.najobc4h2
.najobc4z2
.najobd4z2
.najobd4ź2
.najobd4ż2
.najobr4z2
.najobs4z2
.najoc4h2
.najoc4z2
.najo2d3c2
.najo2d3ć2
.najo4d3d2
.najo2d3f2
.najo2d3g2
.najod3h2
.najod3j2
.najo2d3k2
.najod3l2
.najo2d3m2
.najo2d3n2
.najo2d3p2
.najo2d3s2
.najo2d3ś2
.najo2d3t2
.najod3w2
.najod5ż2
.najodc4h2
.najodc4z2
.najodd4z2
.najodd4ź2
.najodd4ż2
.najods4z2
.najod4z2
.najod4ź2
.najor4z2
.najos4z2
.najro3z4u1
.najr4z2
.najsm2
.najs4z2
.naj2t1k2
.naj2t1r2
.najuc4z2
.najzw2
.nakr2
.napo1
.napo2d2
.napo3b2
.napo3c2
.napo3ć2
.napo3f2
.napo3g2
.napo3h2
.napo3k2
.napo3l2
.napo3ł2
.napo3m2
.napo3p2
.napo3r2
.napo3s2
.napo3ś2
.napo3t2
.napo3w2
.napo3z2
.napo3ź2
.napo3ż2
.napo4m3p
.napoc4h2
.napoc4z2
.napo4d3d
.napod4ź2
.napod4ż2
.napo2m1k2
.napor4z2
.napos4z2
.napr4z2
.naro1
.naro2z3
.nar4z2
.na2r1ż2
.nasm2
.nas4z2
.na2t1c
.natc4h2
.na2t1k2
.naz3m2
.nazw2
.2n1b8
.2n1c8
.2n1ć8
.2n1d8
.ne1
.ne2o3
.2n1f8
.2n1g8
.2n1h8
.ni1
.ni2e1
.nie3b2
.nie3c2
.nie3ć2
.nie3d2
.nie3f2
.nie3g2
.nie3h2
.nie3k2
.nie3l2
.nie3ł2
.nie3m2
.nie3p2
.nie3r2
.nie3s2
.nie3ś2
.nie3t2
.nie3u2
.nie3w2
.nie3z2
.nie3ź2
.nie3ż2
.nie4c3c
.nie4c3k
.nie4d4ź3
.nie4m3c
.nie4m3k
.niec4h2
.niec4z2
.niedo1
.niedo3b2
.niedo3c2
.niedo3ć2
.niedo3d2
.niedo3f2
.niedo3g2
.niedo3h2
.niedo3k2
.niedo3l2
.niedo3ł2
.niedo3m2
.niedo3p2
.niedo3r2
.niedo3s2
.niedo3ś2
.niedo3t2
.niedo3w2
.niedo3z2
.niedo3ź2
.niedo3ż2
.niedobr4z2
.niedoc4h2
.niedoc4z2
.niedod4z2
.niedod4ź2
.niedod4ż2
.niedokr2
.niedo2m1k2
.niedo2p1c
.niedopc4h2
.niedor4z2
.niedos4z2
.niedo2t1k2
.nied4z2
.nied4ż2
.nieo2
.nieob2
.nieo2b3c2
.nieo2b3ć2
.nieo2b3d2
.nieo2b3f2
.nieo2b3g2
.nieob3h2
.nieob3j2
.nieo2b3k2
.nieo2b3m2
.nieo2b3p2
.nieo2b3s2
.nieo2b3ś2
.nieob3w2
.nieo2b3ź2
.nieo2b3ż2
.nieobc4h2
.nieobc4z2
.nieobd4z2
.nieobd4ź2
.nieobd4ż2
.nieobs4z2
.nieoc2
.nieoc4h2
.nieoc4z2
.nieoć2
.nieod2
.nieo2d3c2
.nieo2d3ć2
.nieo4d3d2
.nieo2d3f2
.nieo2d3g2
.nieod3h2
.nieod3j2
.nieo2d3k2
.nieod3l2
.nieod3ł2
.nieo2d3n2
.nieo2d3p2
.nieo2d3s2
.nieo2d3ś2
.nieo2d3t2
.nieodw2
.nieod3w1r
.nieod5ż2
.nieodc4h2
.nieodc4z2
.nieodd4z2
.nieodd4ź2
.nieodd4ż2
.nieods4z2
.nieod4z2
.nieod4ź2
.nieof2
.nieog2
.nieoh2
.nieok2
.nieol2
.nieoł2
.nieom2
.nieop2
.nieor2
.nieor4z2
.nieos2
.nieos4z2
.nieoś2
.nieot2
.nieow2
.nieoz2
.nieoź2
.nieoż2
.niepo1
.niepo2d2
.niepo3b2
.niepo3c2
.niepo3ć2
.niepod3ł2
.niepo3d4łu1
.niepo2d3m2
.niepodmu1
.niepo3d4muc4h
.niepod3r2
.niepodra1
.niepo3d4rap
.niepo3d4raż
.nie1podre1
.niepodre2p1c
.niepo3d4repc4z
.niepo3d4re2p1t
.niepodrę1
.niepo3d4ręc4z
.niepod3w2
.niepodwa1
.niepo3d4waj
.niepo1dwo1
.niepo3d4woj
.niepo3do1
.niepo3du1
.niepo3d4z2
.niepo3d4ź2
.niepo3f2
.niepo3g2
.niepo3h2
.niepo3k2
.niepo3l2
.niepo3ł2
.niepo3m2
.niepo3p2
.niepo3r2
.niepo3s2
.niepo3ś2
.niepo3t2
.niepo3w2
.niepo3z2
.niepo3ź2
.niepo3ż2
.niepodoc4h
.niepo1do1cho1
.niepo4d3o2choc
.niepo4d3o2str4z
.niepoc4h2
.niepoc4z2
.niepo2d3b2
.niepo2d3c2
.niepo2d3ć2
.niepo4d3d2
.niepo2d3f2
.niepo2d3g2
.niepod3h2
.niepod3j2
.niepo2d3k2
.niepod3l2
.niepo2d3n2
.niepo2d3p2
.niepo2d3s2
.niepo2d3ś2
.niepo2d3t2
.niepod5ż
.niepodc4h2
.niepodc4z2
.niepodd4ź2
.niepodd4ż2
.niepodsm2
.niepods4z2
.niepor4z2
.nieposm2
.niepos4z2
.niepr4z
.nie1prze1
.nieprze2d2
.nieprze3b2
.niepr4ze3br4z2
.nieprze3c2
.nieprze3ć2
.nieprzed3ł2
.nieprzedłu1
.nieprze3d4łuż
.nieprze2d3m2
.nieprzedmu1
.nieprze3d4muc4h
.nieprzed3r2
.nieprzedra1
.nieprzedra1ma1
.nieprze3d4ramat
.nieprzedru1
.nieprze3d4ruk
.nieprzedry1
.nieprze3d4ryl
.niepr4ze3d4r4z2
.nieprzed3u2
.nieprze3d4um
.nieprze3dy1
.nieprze3d4z2
.nieprze3d4ź2
.nie1prze1e2
.nieprze3e2k2s3
.nieprze3f2
.nieprze3g2
.nieprze3h2
.nieprze3k2
.nieprze3l2
.nieprze3ł2
.nieprze3m2
.nieprze3n2
.nieprze3p2
.nieprze3r2
.nieprze3s2
.nieprze3ś2
.nieprze3t2
.nieprze3w2
.nieprze3z2
.nieprze3ź2
.nieprze3ż2
.nieprzedłuży1
.nieprze4d5łużyc
.nieprze4d5z2a1
.nieprze4d5z1g2
.ni1eprzedzi1
.nieprze4d5zim
.nieprze4d5zj
.nieprze4d5z1l
.nieprze4d5z2w2r
.nieprzedzwo1
.nieprze4d5zwoj
.nieprze4d5ż2
.nieprzec4h2
.nieprzec4z2
.nieprze2d3c2
.nieprze2d3ć2
.nieprze4d3d2
.nieprze2d3f2
.nieprze2d3g2
.nieprzed3h2
.ni1eprzed3i2
.nieprzed3j2
.nieprze2d3k2
.nieprzed3l2
.nieprze2d3n2
.nieprze2d3p2
.nieprze2d3s2
.nieprzed3s4z2
.nieprze2d3ś2
.nieprze2d3t2
.nieprzed3w2
.nieprzedc4h2
.nieprzedc4z2
.nieprzedd4z2
.nieprzedd4ź2
.nieprzedd4ż2
.niepr4zegr4z2
.nieprzekl2
.nieprzekr2
.nieprze2ł1k2
.nieprze2p1c
.nieprzepc4h2
.niepr4zer4z2
.nieprze2r1ż2
.nieprzesc4h2
.nieprzesm2
.nieprzes4z2
.nieprze2t1k2
.nieprzetr2
.niero1
.niero2z3
.nie1ro3z4e1
.niero3z4u1
.nierozbr4z2
.nieroze3r2
.nierozm2
.niero2z1ś2
.niero2z1t
.nieroztr2
.nier4z2
.niesu1
.niesu2b3
.ni1esubi1
.ni2e1su3b4i2e1
.nies4z2
.nie2t1k2
.nietr2
.nieuc4z2
.nieuw2
.niewy1
.niewy3b2
.niewy3c2
.niewy3ć2
.niewy3d2
.niewy3f2
.niewy3g2
.niewy3h2
.niewy3k2
